Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2702
Purpose of act.

The primary purpose of the State Government Effectiveness Act is to encourage public officials and employees to disclose information concerning possible violations of law and fiscal waste or mismanagement in state government to elected state officials or the Public Counsel and to prohibit reprisals for such disclosures by state employees.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is in the vital interest of the people of this state that their government operate in accordance with the law and without fraud, waste, or mismanagement. If this interest is to be protected, public officials and employees must work in a climate where conscientious service is encouraged and disclosures of illegalities or improprieties may be made without reprisal or fear of reprisal.

Laws 1993, LB 44, § 2.